Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; OPERATIONS AND MAINTENANCE.new text end new text begin (a) $911,544,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $911,544,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for operations and maintenance of the University of Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) Of the amounts appropriated in paragraph (a): new text end new text begin (1) $45,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $45,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are to implement the University of Minnesota's Health Sciences Strategic Plan and address the critical health care challenges facing Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) $40,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $40,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are to advance innovation and new technologies in the biomanufacturing, precision agriculture, hypersonics, and green energy and green iron industries; and new text end new text begin (3) $30,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $30,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are to improve and expand programs and services that increase student success. new text end